src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/de-g2-core.cti
nocross always    jähr       5-245-1235                   #  !JR  #
word       kann       13                           #  K  #
nocross always    kannst     13-23456a                     #  K]  #
nocross always    kapital    13-1234                      #  KP  #
nocross midendword keit      13                           #  K  #
nocross always    komm       13-1346                      #  KX  #
nocross always    konnt      13-2345                      #  KT  #
nocross always    kraft      13-124                       #  KF  #
nocross always    kräft      5-13-124                     #  !KF  #
nocross always    kurz       13-1356                      #  KZ  #
nocross always    kömm       5-13-1346                    #  !KX  #
nocross always    könn       2-13                         #  ,K  #
nocross always    kürz       5-13-1356                    #  !KZ  #
nocross always    lang       123-1245                     #  LG  #
nocross always    lass       2-123                        #  ,L  #
nocross always    leb        123-12                       #  LB  #
nocross always    leicht     123-1456a                     #  L4  #
nocross always    letzt      123-2345                     #  LT  #
nocross midendword lich      456a                          #  _  #
nocross midendword ll        12345                        #  Q  #
nocross always    läng       5-123-1245                   #  !LG  #
nocross always    läss       5-123                        #  !L  #
word       lässt      123                          #  L  #
nocross midendword mal       134                          #  M  #
word       man        134                          #  M  #
nocross always    maschin    134-156a                      #  M5  #
nocross always    material   134-123                      #  ML  #
nocross always    materiell  134-12345                    #  MQ  #
word       mehr       2356a                         #  =  #
nocross always    mehr       2-2356a                       #  ,=  #
nocross always    mir        134-1235                     #  MR  #
word       mit        2345                         #  T  #
nocross always    mit        2-2345                       #  ,T  #
nocross always    mittel     134-2345                     #  MT  #
nocross midendword mm        1346                         #  X  #
word       mr         6-134-1235                   #  'MR  #
always     mr.        134-1235-3                   #  MR.  #
word       mrs        6-134-1235-234               #  'MRS  #
always     mrs.       134-1235-234-3               #  MRS.  #
nocross always    musik      134-13                       #  MK  #
nocross always    muss       134-2346a                     #  M^  #
nocross begmidword möcht     1456a                         #  4  #
nocross always    mög        2-246a                        #  ,9  #
nocross always    möglich    134-456a                      #  M_  #
nocross always    müss       2-134                        #  ,M  #
nocross always    nachdem    1345-145                     #  ND  #
nocross always    nahm       1345-134                     #  NM  #
nocross always    natur      1345-2345                    #  NT  #
nocross always    natürlich  1345-456a                     #  N_  #
nocross always    neben      1345-12                      #  NB  #
nocross always    nehm       1345-125                     #  NH  #
word       nicht      1345                         #  N  #
nocross always    nicht      2-1345                       #  ,N  #
nocross always    nichts     1345-234                     #  NS  #
nocross midendword nis       1346                         #  X  #
nocross always    noch       1345-1456a                    #  N4  #
nocross always    nommen     1345-1346                    #  NX  #
nocross always    notwendig  1345-2456                    #  NW  #
nocross always    nur        1345-1235                    #  NR  #
nocross always    nutz       1345-1356                    #  NZ  #
nocross always    nächst     1345-23456a                   #  N]  #
nocross always    nähm       5-1345-134                   #  !NM  #
nocross always    nütz       5-1345-1356                  #  !NZ  #
word       oder       135                          #  O  #
nocross always    ohne       135-15                       #  OE  #
nocross begmidword or        26a                           #  ?  #
nocross always    or'        26a-6                         #  ?'  #
nocross always    paragraf   1234-1245                    #  PG  #
nocross always    person     1234-1345                    #  PN  #
nocross always    persön     5-1234-1345                  #  !PN  #
nocross always    platz      1234-1356                    #  PZ  #
nocross always    plätz      5-1234-1356                  #  !PZ  #
nocross always    plötzlich  1234-456a                     #  P_  #
nocross always    politik    1234-13                      #  PK  #
nocross always    politisch  1234-156a                     #  P5  #
begword    pro        12345                        #  Q  #
nocross always    prou       1234-1235-135-136            #  PROU  #
nocross always    punkt      1234-2345                    #  PT  #
nocross always    pünkt      5-1234-2345                  #  !PT  #
always     q          6-12345                      #  'Q  #
always     Q          6-12345                      #  'Q  #
nocross always    recht      1235-2345                    #  RT  #
nocross always    regier     1235-1245                    #  RG  #
nocross always    rehabilit  1235-12                      #  RB  #
nocross always    republik   1235-13                      #  RK  #
nocross always    richt      2-3456a                       #  ,#  #
nocross always    rück       1235-46a                      #  R$  #
nocross always    sag        234-1245                     #  SG  #
nocross midendword sam       2346a                         #  ^  #
nocross always    satz       234-1356                     #  SZ  #
word       sch        6-156a                        #  '5  #
nocross always    sch        156a                          #  5  #
sufword    schaft     156a-1-124-2345               #  5AFT  #
nocross midendword schaft    156a                          #  5  #
nocross always    schlag     156a-1245                     #  5G  #
nocross always    schliess   156a-2346a                     #  5^  #
nocross always    schließ    156a-2346a                     #  5^  #
nocross always    schläg     5-156a-1245                   #  !5G  #
word       schon      156a                          #  5  #
nocross always    schreib    156a-12                       #  5B  #
nocross always    schrieb    2-156a                        #  ,5  #
nocross always    schrift    156a-2345                     #  5T  #
nocross always    schwierig  156a-45a                       #  5>  #
nocross always    sehr       234-1235                     #  SR  #
nocross sufword   sein       246a                          #  9  #
nocross always    selbst     234-23456a                    #  S]  #
nocross always    setz       2-15                         #  ,E  #
word       sich       14                           #  C  #
word       sie        234                          #  S  #
nocross always    sind       234-145                      #  SD  #
nocross always    sitz       2-24                         #  ,I  #
word       so         1234                         #  P  #
nocross always    so         2-1234                       #  ,P  #
nocross always    solch      234-1456a                     #  S4  #
nocross always    soll       2-234                        #  ,S  #
nocross always    sondern    234-1345                     #  SN  #
nocross always    sozial     234-123                      #  SL  #
nocross always    spiel      2-346a                        #  ,0  #
nocross always    sprech     2-2346a                       #  ,^  #
word       ss         6-234-234                    #  'SS  #
nocross midendword ss        2346a                         #  ^  #
word       st         234-2345                     #  ST  #
nocross always    st         23456a                        #  ]  #
nocross always    staat      23456a-2345                   #  ]T  #
nocross always    stand      2-23456a                      #  ,]  #
nocross always    stell      2-13456                      #  ,Y  #
nocross always    stets      23456a-234                    #  ]S  #
nocross always    ständ      5-23456a                      #  !]  #
nocross always    säg        5-234-1245                   #  !SG  #
nocross always    sätz       5-234-1356                   #  !SZ  #
nocross midendword te        236a                          #  (  #
nocross always    technik    2345-13                      #  TK  #
nocross always    technisch  2345-156a                     #  T5  #
nocross always    trag       2345-1245                    #  TG  #
nocross always    treff      2345-124                     #  TF  #
nocross always    trotz      2345-1356                    #  TZ  #
nocross always    träg       5-2345-1245                  #  !TG  #
word       tz         6-2345-1356                  #  'TZ  #
word       un         136-1345                     #  UN  #
nocross always    un         256a                          #  /  #
word       und        136                          #  U  #
nocross always    und        2-136                        #  ,U  #
nocross midendword ung       136                          #  U  #
word       unter      256a                          #  /  #
nocross always    unter      2-256a                        #  ,/  #
nocross begword   ver        36b                          #  -  #
nocross always    verhältnis 1236-125                     #  VH  #
nocross always    viel       1236-123                     #  VL  #
nocross always    vielleicht 1236-2345                    #  VT  #
nocross always    volk       1236-13                      #  VK  #
word       voll       12345                        #  Q  #
nocross always    voll       2-12345                      #  ,Q  #
nocross always    vom        1236-134                     #  VM  #
word       von        1236                         #  V  #
nocross always    von        2-1236                       #  ,V  #
word       vor        26a                           #  ?  #
nocross always    vor        2-26a                         #  ,?  #
nocross always    völk       5-1236-13                    #  !VK  #
nocross always    völl       5-12345                      #  !Q  #
nocross always    wahr       2456-125                     #  WH  #
nocross sufword   war        356a                          #  )  #
word       was        2456                         #  W  #
nocross always    weg        2456-1245                    #  WG  #
nocross always    weit       2456-2345                    #  WT  #
nocross always    weis       2-146a                        #  ,3  #
nocross always    welch      13456                        #  Y  #
nocross always    wenig      2456-45a                      #  W>  #
nocross always    wenn       2456-1345                    #  WN  #
nocross always    werd       2-2456                       #  ,W  #
nocross always    wesentlich 2456-456a                     #  W_  #
nocross always    wiss       2456-2346a                    #  W^  #
word       wie        126a                          #  2  #
nocross always    wie        2-126a                        #  ,2  #
nocross always    wieder     346a-145                      #  0D  #
nocross always    will       2456-12345                   #  WQ  #
nocross always    wir        2456-1235                    #  WR  #
nocross always    wird       2456-145                     #  WD  #
nocross always    wirk       2456-13                      #  WK  #
nocross always    wirst      2456-23456a                   #  W]  #
nocross always    wirtschaft 2456-156a                     #  W5  #
nocross always    wohl       2456-123                     #  WL  #
